csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_n.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigosiiwaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: miizhisiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: miizhiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: miizhisiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: miizhiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhisiiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhisiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: miinigoosiiwaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: miinigoowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigosiwaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigoyaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: miizhisiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: miizhiyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: miizhisiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: miizhiyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhisigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhiwaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhisig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: miinigoosiwaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: miinigooyaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigosiwaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: miinigoyaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: miizhisiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: miizhiyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: miizhisiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: miizhiyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhisigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: miizhiwaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhisigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: miizhipan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: miinigoosiwaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: miinigooyaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigosiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: miinisinowagoogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: miininagoogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigoosiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigoowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigoosiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigoowanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: miinisiinogwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: miininogwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: miinigoosiiwegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: miinigoowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigosiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigoyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: miinisinowagog
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: miininagog
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: miinisinowegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: miininegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: miinisinoweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: miinineg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: miinigosiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: miinigooyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: miinigoosiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: miinigooyeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigosiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: miinigoyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: miinisinowagoogoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: miininagoogoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigoosiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: miinigooyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigoosiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: miinigooyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: miinisinokwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: miinikwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: miinigoosiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: miinigooyegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigosiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigowanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: miinisiinowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: miininowaanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: miinisiinowegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: miininowegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: miinisiinowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: miininowegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: miinisiinogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: miininogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: miinigoosiiwanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: miinigoowanen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigosiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigoyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: miinisinowaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: miininaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: miinisinokwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: miinikwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: miinisinok
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: miinik
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: miinigoosiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: miinigooyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: miinigoosiwan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: miinigooyan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigosiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: miinigoyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: miinisinowaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: miininaambaan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: miinisinowegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: miininegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: miinisinowegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: miininegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: miinisinokiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: miinikiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: miinigoosiwamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: miinigooyamban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigosiiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigowaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawagwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaawagwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaawegwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawadwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaawadwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigosiiwaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigowaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: miinaawangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: miinaawangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaasiwaawindwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: miinaawindwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigosigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigowaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwagwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: miinagwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaasiwegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: miinegwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwadwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: miinadwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigosigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigowaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangidwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: miinangidwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: miinangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinaasiwindwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinindwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigosigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: miinigowaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwagwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: miinagwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: miinaasiwegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: miinegwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: miinaasiwadwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: miinadwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigosigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: miinigowaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: miinangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: miinaasiwangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: miinangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinaasiwindwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinindwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigosiinigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigonigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawagen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawagen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasiwaawaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaawaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaagwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigosinig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigonid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimeg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasigwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaawaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigosinigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinigonipan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasigwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaawaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaasigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinaapan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiwindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigosiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawagen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaawagen
